Nebraska, session 109, LB231.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Sections 1 to 16 of this act shall be known and may be cited
as the Uniform Special Deposits Act.
Sec. 2. In the Uniform Special Deposits Act:
(1) Account agreement means an agreement that:
(A) is in a record between a financial institution and one or more
depositors;
(B) may have one or more beneficiaries as additional parties; and
(C) states the intention of the parties to establish a special deposit
governed by the act.
(2) Financial institution means a bank, savings bank, building and loan
association, savings and loan association, or credit union, whether chartered
by the United States, the Department of Banking and Finance, or a foreign state
agency; any other similar organization which is covered by federal deposit
insurance; a trust company; or a digital asset depository that is not a digital
asset depository institution.
(3) Beneficiary means a person that:
(A) is identified as a beneficiary in an account agreement; or
(B) if not identified as a beneficiary in an account agreement, may be
entitled to payment from a special deposit:
(i) under the account agreement; or
(ii) on termination of the special deposit.
(4) Contingency means an event or circumstance stated in an account
agreement that is not certain to occur but must occur before the financial
institution is obligated to pay a beneficiary.
(5) Creditor process means attachment, garnishment, levy, notice of lien,
sequestration, or similar process issued by or on behalf of a creditor or other
claimant.
(6) Depositor means a person that establishes or funds a special deposit.
(7) Good faith means honesty in fact and observance of reasonable
commercial standards of fair dealing.
(8) Knowledge of a fact means:
(A) with respect to a beneficiary, actual knowledge of the fact; or
(B) with respect to a financial institution holding a special deposit:
(i) if the financial institution:
(I) has established a reasonable routine for communicating material
information to an individual to whom the financial institution has assigned
responsibility for the special deposit; and
(II) maintains reasonable compliance with the routine, actual knowledge of
the fact by that individual; or
(ii) if the financial institution has not established and maintained
reasonable compliance with a routine described in clause (i) or otherwise
exercised due diligence, implied knowledge of the fact that would have come to
the attention of an individual to whom the financial institution has assigned
responsibility for the special deposit.
(9) Obligated to pay a beneficiary means a beneficiary is entitled under
the account agreement to receive from the financial institution a payment when:
(A) a contingency has occurred; and
(B) the financial institution has knowledge the contingency has occurred.
Obligation to pay a beneficiary has a corresponding meaning.
(10) Permissible purpose means a governmental, regulatory, commercial,
charitable, or testamentary objective of the parties stated in an account
agreement. The term includes an objective to:
(A) hold funds:
(i) in escrow, including for a purchase and sale, lease, buyback, or other
transaction;
(ii) as a security deposit of a tenant;
(iii) that may be distributed to a person as remuneration, retirement or
other benefit, or compensation under a judgment, consent decree, court order,
or other decision of a tribunal; or
(iv) for distribution to a defined class of persons after identification
of the class members and their interest in the funds;
(B) provide assurance with respect to an obligation created by contract,
such as earnest money to ensure a transaction closes;
(C) settle an obligation that arises in the operation of a payment system,
securities settlement system, or other financial market infrastructure;
(D) provide assurance with respect to an obligation that arises in the
operation of a payment system, securities settlement system, or other financial
market infrastructure; or
(E) hold margin, other cash collateral, or funds that support the orderly
-1-

LB231 LB231
2025 2025
functioning of financial market infrastructure or the performance of an
obligation with respect to the infrastructure.
(11) Person means an individual, estate, business or nonprofit entity,
government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or other
legal entity. The term includes a protected series, however denominated, of an
entity if the protected series is established under law that limits, or limits
if conditions specified under law are satisfied, the ability of a creditor of
the entity or of any other protected series of the entity to satisfy a claim
from assets of the protected series.
(12) Record means information:
(A) inscribed on a tangible medium; or
(B) stored in an electronic or other medium and retrievable in perceivable
form.
(13) Special deposit means a deposit that satisfies section 5 of this act.
(14) State means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia,
Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any other territory or
possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States. The term includes
an agency or instrumentality of the state.
Sec. 3. (a) The Uniform Special Deposits Act applies to a special deposit
under an account agreement that states the intention of the parties to
establish a special deposit governed by the act, regardless of whether a party
to the account agreement or a transaction related to the special deposit, or
the special deposit itself, has a reasonable relation to this state.
(b) The parties to an account agreement may choose a forum in this state
for settling a dispute arising out of the special deposit, regardless of
whether a party to the account agreement or a transaction related to the
special deposit, or the special deposit itself, has a reasonable relation to
this state.
(c) The act does not affect:
(1) a right or obligation relating to a deposit other than a special
deposit under the act; or
(2) the voidability of a deposit or transfer that is fraudulent or
voidable under other law.
Sec. 4. (a) The effect of sections 2 to 6, 8 to 11, and 14 of this act
may not be varied by agreement, except as provided in those sections. Subject
to subsection (b), the effect of sections 7, 12, and 13 of this act may be
varied by agreement.
(b) A provision in an account agreement or other record that substantially
excuses liability or substantially limits remedies for failure to perform an
obligation under the Uniform Special Deposits Act is not sufficient to vary the
effect of a provision of the act.
(c) If a beneficiary is a party to an account agreement, the financial
institution and the depositor may amend the agreement without the consent of
the beneficiary only if the agreement expressly permits the amendment.
(d) If a beneficiary is not a party to an account agreement and the
financial institution and the depositor know the beneficiary has knowledge of
the agreement's terms, the financial institution and the depositor may amend
the agreement without the consent of the beneficiary only if the amendment does
not adversely and materially affect a payment right of the beneficiary.
(e) If a beneficiary is not a party to an account agreement and the
financial institution and the depositor do not know whether the beneficiary has
knowledge of the agreement's terms, the financial institution and the depositor
may amend the agreement without the consent of the beneficiary only if the
amendment is made in good faith.
Sec. 5. A deposit is a special deposit if it is:
(1) a deposit of funds in a financial institution under an account
agreement;
(2) for the benefit of at least two beneficiaries, one or more of which
may be a depositor;
(3) denominated in a medium of exchange that is currently authorized or
adopted by a domestic or foreign government;
(4) for a permissible purpose stated in the account agreement; and
(5) subject to a contingency.
Sec. 6. (a) A special deposit must serve at least one permissible purpose
stated in the account agreement from the time the special deposit is created in
the account agreement until termination of the special deposit.
(b) If, before termination of the special deposit, the financial
institution or a court determines the special deposit no longer satisfies
subsection (a), sections 8 to 11 of this act cease to apply to any funds
deposited in the special deposit after the special deposit ceases to satisfy
subsection (a).
(c) If, before termination of a special deposit, the financial institution
determines the special deposit no longer satisfies subsection (a), the
financial institution may take action it believes is necessary under the
circumstances, including terminating the special deposit.
Sec. 7. (a) Unless the account agreement provides otherwise, the
financial institution is obligated to pay a beneficiary if there are sufficient
actually and finally collected funds in the balance of the special deposit.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), the obligation to pay the
beneficiary is excused if the funds available in the special deposit are
insufficient to cover such payment.
(c) Unless the account agreement provides otherwise, if the funds
available in the special deposit are insufficient to cover an obligation to pay
-2-

LB231 LB231
2025 2025
a beneficiary, a beneficiary may elect to be paid the funds that are available
or, if there is more than one beneficiary, a pro rata share of the funds
available. Payment to the beneficiary making the election under this subsection
discharges the financial institution's obligation to pay a beneficiary and does
not constitute an accord and satisfaction with respect to another person
obligated to the beneficiary.
(d) Unless the account agreement provides otherwise, the obligation of the
financial institution obligated to pay a beneficiary is immediately due and
payable.
(e) The financial institution may discharge its obligation under this
section by:
(1) crediting another transaction account of the beneficiary; or
(2) taking other action that:
(i) is permitted under the account agreement for the financial institution
to obtain a discharge; or
(ii) otherwise would constitute a discharge under law.
(f) If the financial institution obligated to pay a beneficiary has
incurred an obligation to discharge the obligation of another person, the
obligation of the other person is discharged if action by the financial
institution under subsection (e) would constitute a discharge of the obligation
of the other person under law that determines whether an obligation is
satisfied.
Sec. 8. (a) Neither a depositor nor a beneficiary has a property interest
in a special deposit.
(b) Any property interest with respect to a special deposit is only in the
right to receive payment if the financial institution is obligated to pay a
beneficiary and not in the special deposit itself. Any property interest under
this subsection is determined under other law.
Sec. 9. (a) Subject to subsection (b), creditor process with respect to a
special deposit is not enforceable against the financial institution holding
the special deposit.
(b) Creditor process is enforceable against the financial institution
holding a special deposit with respect to an amount the financial institution
is obligated to pay a beneficiary or a depositor if the process:
(1) is served on the financial institution;
(2) provides sufficient information to permit the financial institution to
identify the depositor or the beneficiary from the financial institution's
books and records; and
(3) gives the financial institution a reasonable opportunity to act on the
process.
(c) Creditor process served on a financial institution before it is
enforceable against the financial institution under subsection (b) does not
create a right of the creditor against the financial institution or a duty of
the financial institution to the creditor. Other law determines whether
creditor process creates a lien enforceable against the beneficiary on a
contingent interest of a beneficiary, including a depositor as a beneficiary,
even if not enforceable against the financial institution.
Sec. 10. A court may enjoin, or grant similar relief that would have the
effect of enjoining, a financial institution from paying a depositor or
beneficiary only if payment would constitute a material fraud or facilitate a
material fraud with respect to a special deposit.
Sec. 11. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b) or (c), a financial
institution may not exercise a right of recoupment or set off against a special
deposit.
(b) An account agreement may authorize the financial institution to debit
the special deposit:
(1) when the financial institution becomes obligated to pay a beneficiary,
in an amount that does not exceed the amount necessary to discharge the
obligation;
(2) for a fee assessed by the financial institution that relates to an
overdraft in the special deposit account;
(3) for costs incurred by the financial institution that relate directly
to the special deposit; or
(4) to reverse an earlier credit posted by the financial institution to
the balance of the special deposit account, if the reversal occurs under an
event or circumstance warranted under other law of this state governing mistake
and restitution.
(c) The financial institution holding a special deposit may exercise a
right of recoupment or set off against an obligation to pay a beneficiary, even
if the financial institution funds payment from the special deposit.
Sec. 12. (a) A financial institution does not have a fiduciary duty to
any person with respect to a special deposit.
(b) When the financial institution holding a special deposit becomes
obligated to pay a beneficiary, a debtor-creditor relationship arises between
the financial institution and beneficiary.
(c) The financial institution holding a special deposit has a duty to a
beneficiary to comply with the account agreement and the Uniform Special
Deposits Act.
(d) If the financial institution holding a special deposit does not comply
with the account agreement or the act, the financial institution is liable to a
depositor or beneficiary only for damages proximately caused by the
noncompliance. Except as provided by other law of this state, the financial
institution is not liable for consequential, special, or punitive damages.
-3-

LB231 LB231
2025 2025
(e) The financial institution holding a special deposit may rely on
records presented in compliance with the account agreement to determine whether
the financial institution is obligated to pay a beneficiary.
(f) If the account agreement requires payment on presentation of a record,
the financial institution shall determine within a reasonable time whether the
record is sufficient to require payment. If the agreement requires action by
the financial institution on presentation of a record, the financial
institution is not liable for relying in good faith on the genuineness of the
record if the record appears on its face to be genuine.
(g) Unless the account agreement provides otherwise, the financial
institution is not required to determine whether a permissible purpose stated
in the agreement continues to exist.
Sec. 13. (a) Unless otherwise provided in the account agreement, a
special deposit terminates five years after the date the special deposit was
first funded.
(b) Unless otherwise provided in the account agreement, if the financial
institution cannot identify or locate a beneficiary entitled to payment when
the special deposit is terminated, and a balance remains in the special
deposit, the financial institution shall pay the balance to the depositor or
depositors as a beneficiary or beneficiaries.
(c) A financial institution that pays the remaining balance as provided
under subsection (b) has no further obligation with respect to the special
deposit.
Sec. 14. The Uniform Commercial Code, consumer protection law, law
governing deposits generally, law related to escheat and abandoned or unclaimed
property, and the principles of law and equity, including law related to
capacity to contract, principal and agent, estoppel, fraud, misrepresentation,
duress, coercion, mistake, and bankruptcy, supplement the Uniform Special
Deposits Act except to the extent inconsistent with the act.
Sec. 15. In applying and construing the Uniform Special Deposits Act, a
court shall consider the promotion of uniformity of the law among jurisdictions
that enact it.
Sec. 16. The Uniform Special Deposits Act applies to:
(1) a special deposit made under an account agreement executed on or after
the effective date of this act; and
(2) a deposit made under an agreement executed before the effective date
of this act, if:
(A) all parties entitled to amend the agreement agree to make the deposit
a special deposit governed by the act; and
(B) the special deposit referenced in the amended agreement satisfies
section 5 of this act.
-4-